src/fst/phonology.twolc
!! ryden+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: **riidet/ratsastaa/ride**
!!€ r%{eiØ%}%{yaØ%}d%^ABL2
!!€ reyd0

!!$ r%{eiØ%}%{yaØ%}d%^ABL2
!!$ r%{eiØ%}%{yaØ%}d0

!!$ r%{eiØ%}%{yaØ%}d%^ABL2
!!$ re%{yaØ%}d0

"Ablaut grade 2 and 3 in class 2a" 
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{eouü%}:o <=> _ %{Øeua%}: Cns %^ABL2: ;
                _ %{Øeua%}: Cns %^ABL3: ;

"Second part of ablaut grade 2 in class 2a" 
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{Øeua%}:u <=> %{eouü%}: _ Cns %^ABL2: ;

!! beden+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: **bivdit/pyytää/ask**
!!€ b%{eouü%}%{Øeua%}d%^ABL2
!!€ boud0

!!$ b%{eouü%}%{Øeua%}d%^ABL2
!!$ b%{eouü%}%{Øeua%}d0

!!$ b%{eouü%}%{Øeua%}d%^ABL2
!!$ bo%{Øeua%}d0

"Ablaut grade 2 and 3 in class 2b"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{uüo%}:o <=> _ %{uaØ%}: Cns %^ABL2: ;
               _ %{uaØ%}: Cns %^ABL3: ;

"Second part of ablaut grade 2 in class 2b"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{uaØ%}:u <=> %{uüo%}: _ Cns %^ABL2: ;

!! krupen+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: **čákŋat/ryömiä/creep**
!!€ kr%{uüo%}%{uaØ%}p%^ABL2
!!€ kroup0

!!$ kr%{uüo%}%{uaØ%}p%^ABL2
!!$ kr%{uüo%}%{uaØ%}p0

!!$ kr%{uüo%}%{uaØ%}p%^ABL2
!!$ kro%{uaØ%}p0

"Ablaut grade 2 and 3 in class 3a"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{iua%}:u <=> _ Cns Cns %^ABL2: ;
               _ Cns Cns %^ABL3: ;

!! drinken+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: **juhkat/juoda/drink**
!!€ dr%{iua%}nk%^ABL2
!!€ drunk0

!!$ dr%{iua%}nk%^ABL2
!!$ dr%{iua%}nk0

!! drinken+V+PrfPrt: **juhkat/juoda/drink**
!!€ dr%{iua%}nk%^ABL3%>en
!!€ drunk0%>en

!!$ dr%{iua%}nk%^ABL3%>en
!!$ dr%{iua%}nk0%>en

"Ablaut grade 2 and 3 in class 3b and 3c"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{eoa%}:u <=> _ Cns Cns %^ABL2: ;
               _ Cns Cns %^ABL3: ;

!! helpen+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: **veahkehit/auttaa/help**
!!€ h%{eoa%}lp%^ABL2
!!€ holp0

!!$ h%{eoa%}lp%^ABL2
!!$ h%{eoa%}lp0

!! helpen+V+PrfPrt: **veahkehit/auttaa/help**
!!€ h%{eoa%}lp%^ABL3%>en
!!€ holp0%>en

!!$ h%{eoa%}lp%^ABL3%>en
!!$ h%{eoa%}lp0%>en

"Ablaut grade 2 in class 4a (with generalised old conjunctive for northern and northeastern dialects)"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{iaeo%}:a <=> _ %{aeØ%}: Cns %^ABL2U: ;
"Second part of ablaut grade 2 in class 4a+b+c and 5a+b (with generalised old conjunctive for northern and northeastern dialects)"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{aeØ%}:e <=> %{iaeo%}: _ Cns %^ABL2U: ;
               %{eiao%}: _ Cns %^ABL2U: ;
               %{iae%}: _ Cns %^ABL2U: ;
               %{eia%}: _ Cns %^ABL2U: ;

!! niamen+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: **váldit/ottaa/take**
!!€ n%{iaeo%}%{aeØ%}m%^ABL2U
!!€ naem0

!!$ n%{iaeo%}%{aeØ%}m%^ABL2U
!!$ n%{iaeo%}%{aeØ%}m0

!!$ n%{iaeo%}%{aeØ%}m%^ABL2U
!!$ na%{aeØ%}m0

"Ablaut grade 2 in class 4b (with generalised old conjunctive for northern and northeastern dialects)"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{eiao%}:a <=> _ %{aeØ%}: Cns %^ABL2U: ;

!! dreapen+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: **deaivvadit/tavata/meet**
!!€ dr%{eiao%}%{aeØ%}p%^ABL2U
!!€ draep0


"Ablaut grade 2 and 3 in class 4c"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{eio%}:o <=> _ %{aØo%}: Cns %^ABL2: ;
               _ %{aØo%}: Cns %^ABL3: ;
"Second part of ablaut grade 2 in class 4c"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{aØo%}:o <=> %{eio%}: _ Cns %^ABL2: ;

!! spreaken+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: **hupmat/puhua/speak**
!!€ spr%{eio%}%{aØo%}k%^ABL2
!!€ sprook0

"Ablaut grade 2 in class 5a (with generalised old conjunctive for northern and northeastern dialects)"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{iae%}:a <=> _ %{aeØ%}: Cns %^ABL2U: ;

!! giaven+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: **addit/antaa/give**
!!€ g%{iae%}%{aeØ%}v%^ABL2U
!!€ gaev0%>t

"Ablaut grade 2 in class 5b (with generalised old conjunctive for northern and northeastern dialects)"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{eia%}:a <=> _ %{aeØ%}: Cns %^ABL2U: ;

!! steaken+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: **čugget/pistää/stab**
!!€ st%{eia%}%{aeØ%}k%^ABL2U
!!€ staek0

"Second part of ablaut grade 3 in class 1"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{yaØ%}:a <=> %{eiØ%}: _ Cns %^ABL3: ;

!! ryden+V+PrfPrc: **riidet/ratsastaa/ride**
!!€ r%{eiØ%}%{yaØ%}d%^ABL3%>en
!!€ read0%>en

!!$ r%{eiØ%}%{yaØ%}d%^ABL3%>en
!!$ r%{eiØ%}%{yaØ%}d0%>en

!!$ r%{eiØ%}%{yaØ%}d%^ABL3%>en
!!$ re%{yaØ%}d0%>en

"Second part of ablaut grade 3 in class 2a" 
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{Øeua%}:a <=> %{eouü%}: _ Cns %^ABL3: ;

!! beden+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: **bivdit/pyytää/ask**
!!€ b%{eouü%}%{Øeua%}d%^ABL3%>en
!!€ boad0%>en

!!$ b%{eouü%}%{Øeua%}d%^ABL3%>en
!!$ b%{eouü%}%{Øeua%}d0%>en

!!$ b%{eouü%}%{Øeua%}d%^ABL3%>en
!!$ bo%{Øeua%}d0%>en

"Second part of ablaut grade 3 in class 2b"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{uaØ%}:a <=> %{uüo%}: _ Cns %^ABL3: ;

!! krupen+V+PrfPrc: **čákŋat/ryömiä/creep**
!!€ kr%{uüo%}%{uaØ%}p%^ABL3%>en
!!€ kroap0%>en

!!$ kr%{uüo%}%{uaØ%}p%^ABL3%>en
!!$ kr%{uüo%}%{uaØ%}p0%>en

!!$ kr%{uüo%}%{uaØ%}p%^ABL3%>en
!!$ kro%{uaØ%}p0%>en

!!$ kr%{uüo%}%{uaØ%}p%^ABL2
!!$ kro%{uaØ%}p0

!2019-01-18a!"Ablaut grade 3 in class 3a"
!2019-01-18a!!! __ @RULENAME@ __
!2019-01-18a! %{iua%}:u <=> _ Cns Cns %^ABL3: ;
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!! drinken+V+PrfPrt: __juhkat/juoda/drink__
!2019-01-18a!!!€ dr%{iua%}nk%^ABL3%>en
!2019-01-18a!!!€ drunk0%>en
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!!$ dr%{iua%}nk%^ABL3%>en
!2019-01-18a!!!$ dr%{iua%}nk0%>en
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!"Ablaut grade 3 in class 3b and 3c"
!2019-01-18a!!! __ @RULENAME@ __
!2019-01-18a! %{eoa%}:u <=> _ Cns Cns %^ABL2: ;
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!! helpen+V+PrfPrt: __veahkehit/auttaa/help__
!2019-01-18a!!!€ h%{eoa%}lp%^ABL3%>en
!2019-01-18a!!!€ holp0%>en
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!!$ h%{eoa%}lp%^ABL3%>en
!2019-01-18a!!!$ h%{eoa%}lp0%>en

"Ablaut grade 3 in class 4a+b"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{iaeo%}:o <=> _ %{aeØ%}: Cns %^ABL3: ;

"Second part of ablaut grade 3 in class 4a"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{aeØ%}:a <=> %{iaeo%}: _ Cns %^ABL3: ;
               %{eiao%}: _ Cns %^ABL3: ;

!! niamen+V+PrfPrt: **váldit/ottaa/take**
!!€ n%{iaeo%}%{aeØ%}m%^ABL3%>en
!!€ noam0%>en

!!$ n%{iaeo%}%{aeØ%}m%^ABL3%>en
!!$ n%{iaeo%}%{aeØ%}m0%>en

!!$ n%{iaeo%}%{aeØ%}m%^ABL3%>en
!!$ na%{aeØ%}m0%>en

"Ablaut grade 3 in class 4b"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{eiao%}:o <=> _ %{aeØ%}: Cns %^ABL3: ;

!! dreapen+V+PrfPrt: **deaivvadit/tavata/meet**
!!€ dr%{eiao%}%{aeØ%}p%^ABL3%>en
!!€ droap0%>en

!!$ dr%{eiao%}%{aeØ%}p%^ABL3%>en
!!$ dr%{eiao%}%{aeØ%}p0%>en

!!$ dr%{eiao%}%{aeØ%}p%^ABL3%>en
!!$ dro%{aeØ%}p0%>en

"Second part of ablaut grade 3 in class 4c"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{aØo%}:a <=> %{eio%}: _ Cns %^ABL3: ;

!! spreaken+V+PrfPrt: **hupmat/puhua/speak**
!!€ spr%{eio%}%{aØo%}k%^ABL3%>en
!!€ sproak0%>en

!!$ spr%{eio%}%{aØo%}k%^ABL3%>en
!!$ spr%{eio%}%{aØo%}k0%>en

!!$ spr%{eio%}%{aØo%}k%^ABL3%>en
!!$ spro%{aØo%}k0%>en
